North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 33. Airport Authorities. [Repealed]

§§ 116-271 through 116-275.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.41(a), effective June 23, 2011.

History.

S. 116-271; 2008-204, s. 4.2; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.41(a), effective June 23, 2011. s. 116-272; 2008-204, s. 4.2; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.41(a), effective June 23, 2011. s. 116-273; 2008-204, s. 4.2; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.41(a), effective June 23, 2011. s. 116-274; 2008-204, s. 4.2; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.41(a), effective June 23, 2011. s. 116-275; 2008-204, s. 4.2; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.41(a), effective June 23, 2011.

§§ 116-276 through 116-279.

Reserved for future codification purposes.